Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB848.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of July 7, 1980 (P.L.380, No.97), known as the Solid Waste Management Act, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 606.1. Criminal proceedings.The Office of Attorney General under the act of October 15, 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425 1980 (P.L.950, No.164), known as the "Commonwealth Attorneys Act," or any district attorney of any affected county may commence criminal proceedings for the enforcement of this act and regulations promulgated under this act.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0848PN0878 - 2 - 12345